en: Climbing rope type: Accessory Cord; Arborist Climbing Line; Canyoneering Rope; Dynamic Half (Double); Dynamic Single; Dynamic Twin; Rescue Rope; Static Type A; Static Type B; Tag Line; Other
pl: Typ liny wspinaczkowej: Repik; Lina arborystyczna; Lina kanioningowa; Dynamiczna połówkowa (podwójna); Dynamiczna pojedyncza; Dynamiczna bliźniacza; Lina ratownicza; Statyczna typu A; Statyczna typu B; Lina pomocnicza; Inne
zh-CN: 攀岩绳类型: 辅绳; 树木攀爬绳; 溪降绳; 动力半绳（双绳）; 动力单绳; 动力对绳; 救援绳; A 类静力绳; B 类静力绳; 牵引绳; 其他
th: ประเภทของเชือกปีนเขา: เชือกเสริม; เชือกปีนต้นไม้; เชือกแคนยอนเนียริง; ไดนามิกฮาล์ฟ (คู่); ไดนามิกเดี่ยว; ไดนามิกแฝด; เชือกกู้ภัย; สแตติก ประเภท A; สแตติก ประเภท B; เชือกดึง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta plezalne vrvi: Pomožna vrvica; Arboristična vrv; Soteskarska vrv; Dinamična polovična (dvojna); Dinamična enojna; Dinamična dvojček; Reševalna vrv; Statična tipa A; Statična tipa B; Vlečna vrv (tag line); Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta užeta za penjanje: Pomoćna zamka; Arborističko uže; Uže za kanjoning; Dinamičko polovično (dvostruko); Dinamičko jednostruko; Dinamičko blizanačko; Uže za spašavanje; Statičko tipa A; Statičko tipa B; Pomoćno uže (tag line); Ostalo
es: Tipo cuerda de escalada: Cordino accesorio; Cuerda de escalada para arboricultura; Cuerda para barranquismo; Dinámica media (doble); Dinámica simple; Dinámica gemela; Cuerda de rescate; Estática tipo A; Estática tipo B; Cuerda auxiliar; Otro
lt-LT: Laipiojimo virvės tipas: Pagalbinis kordas; Arboristų laipiojimo virvė; Kanjoningo virvė; Dinaminė pusinė (dviguba); Dinaminė vienguba; Dinaminė dvynė; Gelbėjimo virvė; Statinė, A tipo; Statinė, B tipo; Pagalbinė traukimo virvė; Kita
fi: Kiipeilyköyden tyyppi: Tarvikenaru; Arboristien kiipeilyköysi; Kanjonointiköysi; Dynaaminen puoliköysi (tupla); Dynaaminen yksinkertainen köysi; Dynaaminen tuplaköysi; Pelastusköysi; Staattinen tyyppi A; Staattinen tyyppi B; Vetonaru; Muu
cs: Typ lezeckého lana: Pomocná šňůra (reep); Stromolezecké lano; Canyoningové lano; Dynamické poloviční lano; Dynamické jednoduché lano; Dynamické dvojité lano; Záchranářské lano; Statické typ A; Statické typ B; Pomocné lano (tag line); Jiné
tr: Tırmanma ipi tipi: Yardımcı ip; Ağaç tırmanış ipi; Kanyon tırmanış ipi; Yarım dinamik (çift); Tekli dinamik; İkiz dinamik; Kurtarma ipi; Statik A tipi; Statik B tipi; Kılavuz ip; Diğer
ko: 클라이밍 로프 유형: 액세서리 코드; 아보리스트 클라이밍 라인; 캐니어닝 로프; 다이내믹 하프(더블); 다이내믹 싱글; 다이내믹 트윈; 구조용 로프; 스태틱 타입 A; 스태틱 타입 B; 태그 라인; 기타
sv: Typ av klätterrep: Repsnöre; Klätterrep för arborister; Canyoningrep; Dynamiskt halvrep (dubbelrep); Dynamiskt enkelrep; Dynamiskt tvillingrep; Räddningsrep; Statiskt typ A; Statiskt typ B; Hisslina; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ lezeckého lana: Pomocná šnúra; Arboristické lano; Canyoningové lano; Dynamické polovičné; Dynamické jednoduché; Dynamické dvojité; Záchranárske lano; Statické typu A; Statické typu B; Pomocné lano; Iné
hu: Mászókötél típusa: Segédkötél; Faápoló kötél; Kanyonkötél; Dinamikus félkötél; Dinamikus egészkötél; Dinamikus ikerkötél; Mentőkötél; Statikus (A típus); Statikus (B típus); Húzókötél; Egyéb
da: Type af klatrereb: Rebsnor; Træklatringsreb (arboristreb); Canyoneering-reb; Dynamisk halvreb (dobbeltreb); Dynamisk enkeltreb; Dynamisk tvillingereb; Redningsreb; Statisk type A; Statisk type B; Hejsereb; Andet
ja: クライミングロープタイプ: アクセサリーコード; アーボリストクライミングライン; キャニオニングロープ; ダイナミックハーフ (ダブル); ダイナミックシングル; ダイナミックツイン; レスキューロープ; スタティック タイプA; スタティック タイプB; タグライン; その他
el: Τύπος σχοινιού αναρρίχησης: Βοηθητικό κορδόνι; Σχοινί δενδροκομίας; Σχοινί canyoning; Δυναμικό μισό (διπλό); Δυναμικό μονό; Δυναμικό δίδυμο; Σχοινί διάσωσης; Στατικό τύπου Α; Στατικό τύπου Β; Tag line; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип катерачно въже: Помощно въже; Въже за арбористи; Въже за каньонинг; Динамично половин (двойно); Динамично единично; Динамично близначно; Спасително въже; Статично тип A; Статично тип B; Водещо въже; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de corda de escalada: Corda acessória; Corda de arboricultura; Corda de canionismo; Dinâmica meia (dupla); Dinâmica simples; Dinâmica gémea; Corda de resgate; Estática tipo A; Estática tipo B; Corda auxiliar; Outro
vi: Loại dây leo: Dây phụ; Dây leo cây; Dây vượt thác; Dây động Half (Double); Dây động đơn; Dây động Twin; Dây cứu hộ; Dây tĩnh loại A; Dây tĩnh loại B; Dây kéo tời (Tag line); Khác
nl: Klimtouw type: Prusiktouw; Boomklimtouw; Canyoningtouw; Dynamisch halftouw (dubbeltouw); Dynamisch enkeltouw; Dynamisch tweelingtouw; Reddingstouw; Statisch type A; Statisch type B; Tagline; Overig
fr: Type de corde d’escalade: Cordelette; Corde d’élagage; Corde de canyoning; Corde à double (dynamique); Corde à simple (dynamique); Corde jumelée (dynamique); Corde de sauvetage; Statique type A; Statique type B; Corde de hissage; Autre
it: Tipo di corda da arrampicata: Cordino; Corda per tree climbing; Corda da torrentismo; Mezza corda dinamica; Corda singola dinamica; Corda gemella dinamica; Corda da soccorso; Statica Tipo A; Statica Tipo B; Cordino di recupero; Altro
de: Typ des Kletterseils: Reepschnur; Baumpflegeseil; Canyoningseil; Dynamisches Halbseil (Doppelseil); Dynamisches Einfachseil; Dynamisches Zwillingsseil; Rettungsseil; Statisches Seil Typ A; Statisches Seil Typ B; Tag Line; Andere
ru: Тип скалолазной веревки: Вспомогательный шнур (репшнур); Арбористическая веревка; Веревка для каньонинга; Динамическая половинная (двойная); Динамическая одинарная; Динамическая сдвоенная; Спасательная веревка; Статическая (тип A); Статическая (тип B); Вспомогательный конец; Другая
nb: Klatretautype: Hjelpetau; Arboristtau; Juvvandringstau; Dynamisk halvtau (dobbeltau); Dynamisk enkelttau; Dynamisk tvillingtau; Redningstau; Statisk type A; Statisk type B; Trekkline; Annet
zh-TW: 攀岩繩類型: 輔助繩; 攀樹繩; 溪降繩; 動態雙繩 (半繩); 動態單繩; 動態對繩; 救援繩; A 型靜態繩; B 型靜態繩; 牽引繩; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de coardă de alpinism: Coardă auxiliară (cordelină); Coardă de arboricultură; Coardă de canyoning; Dinamică semicoardă (dublă); Dinamică simplă; Dinamică geamănă; Coardă de salvare; Statică Tip A; Statică Tip B; Coardă de ghidare; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de corda de escalada: Cordelete; Corda para arborismo; Corda para canionismo; Dinâmica meia corda (dupla); Dinâmica simples; Dinâmica gêmea; Corda de resgate; Estática Tipo A; Estática Tipo B; Tag line; Outras